New York, session 2025-2026, A714.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2879-a of the public authorities 2 law, as added by chapter 506 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Except as set forth in subdivision three of this section, where the 5 comptroller determines pursuant to [his or her] such comptroller's 6 authority to supervise the accounts of public corporations, that 7 contracts or categories of contracts in excess of one million dollars 8 [(a)] to be awarded by a state authority [to a single source, a sole 9 source or pursuant to any other method of procurement that is not 10 competitive, or (b) which are to be paid in whole or in part from monies 11 appropriated by the state to a state authority for such contractual 12 expenditure], require supervision in the form of prior review and 13 approval of such contracts, and the comptroller so notifies such author- 14 ity of such determination, then any such contract entered into subse- 15 quent to such notification shall be submitted to the comptroller for 16 [his or her] such comptroller's approval and shall not be a valid 17 enforceable contract unless it shall first have been approved by the 18 comptroller. Such notification shall identify the process for 19 submission, the categories of contracts at issue and the time period for 20 which such submission is to take place. The comptroller shall promulgate 21 such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out [his or her] 22 such comptroller's responsibilities under this section, including but 23 not limited to the standards for determining which contracts will be EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02628-01-5 A. 714 2 1 subject to [his or her] such comptroller's review and for approving such 2 contracts. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 4 have become a law.